Utah statutes.
59-2-324.   Entering corrected sum of taxes in assessment book.
The county auditor shall then compute, and enter in a separate money column in
the assessment book, the aggregate sum in dollars and cents to be paid as
taxes on the property enumerated in the book.  Taxes levied only on a certain
kind or class of property for a special purpose, other than for state, county,
city, town, and school purposes, etc., shall be separately set out, and shall
foot up the column showing the total amount of the taxes, and the column of
total value of property in the county, as corrected by the commission.
